North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 6. Communicable Diseases.
§ 130A-197.
Management of dogs, cats, and ferrets exposed to rabies.

When the local health director reasonably suspects that an animal required to be vaccinated under this Part has been exposed to the saliva or nervous tissue of a proven rabid animal or animal reasonably suspected of having rabies that is not available
for laboratory diagnosis, the animal shall be considered to have been exposed to rabies. The recommendations and guidelines for rabies post-exposure management specified by the National Association of State Public Health Veterinarians
in the most current edition of the Compendium of Animal Rabies Prevention and Control shall be the required control measures.

History.
1935, c. 122, s. 14; 1953, c. 876, s. 10; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2000-163, s. 4; 2009-327, s. 12; 2017-106, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-327, s. 12, effective October 1, 2009, substituted “animals” and “animal” for “dogs and cats” and “dog or cat”, respectively, throughout this section; in the first sentence, substituted “an animal required to be vaccinated under this
Part” for “a dog or cat”; and in the last sentence, substituted “28 days” for “three weeks” and “five days” for “three days”.

Session Laws 2017-106, s. 1., effective October 1, 2017, rewrote the section heading, which read: “Infected animals to be destroyed; protection of vaccinated animals”; deleted the former last two sentences, which read: “An animal exposed to rabies shall
be destroyed immediately by its owner, the county Animal Control Officer or a peace officer unless the animal has been vaccinated against rabies in accordance with this Part and the rules of the Commission more than 28 days prior to
being exposed, and is given a booster dose of rabies vaccine within five days of the exposure. As an alternative to destruction, the animal may be quarantined at a facility approved by the local health director for a period up to six
months, and under reasonable conditions imposed by the local health director”; and added the last sentence.

§ 130A-198.
Confinement.

A person who owns or has possession of an animal which is suspected of having rabies shall immediately notify the local health director or county Animal Control Officer and shall securely confine the animal in a place designated by the local health director.
The animal shall be confined for a period of 10 days. Other animals may be destroyed at the discretion of the State Public Health Veterinarian.

History.
1935, c. 122, s. 15; c. 344; 1941, c. 259, s. 10; 1953, c. 876, s. 11; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2009-327, s. 13.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-327, s. 13, effective October 1, 2009, substituted “The animal” for “Dogs and cats” at the beginning of the second sentence.

§ 130A-199.
Rabid animals to be destroyed; heads to be sent to State Laboratory of Public Health.

An animal diagnosed as having rabies by a licensed veterinarian shall be destroyed and its head sent to the State Laboratory of Public Health. The heads of all animals that die during a confinement period required by this Part shall be immediately sent
to the State Laboratory of Public Health for rabies diagnosis.

History.
1935, c. 122, s. 16; 1953, c. 876, s. 12; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2009-327, s. 14.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-327, s. 14, effective October 1, 2009, substituted “animals that die during a confinement period required by this Part” for “dogs and cats that die during the 10-day confinement period required by

G.S. 130A-196

” in the second sentence.

§ 130A-200.
Confinement or leashing of vicious animals.

A local health director may declare an animal to be vicious and a menace to the public health when the animal has attacked a person causing bodily harm without being teased, molested, provoked, beaten, tortured or otherwise harmed. When an animal has
been declared to be vicious and a menace to the public health, the local health director shall order the animal to be confined to its owner’s property. However, the animal may be permitted to leave its owner’s property when accompanied
by a responsible adult and restrained on a leash.

History.
1935, c. 122, s. 18; 1953, c. 876, s. 14; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-201.
Rabies emergency.

A local health director in whose county or district rabies is found in the wild animal population as evidenced by a positive diagnosis of rabies in the past year in any wild animal, except a bat, may petition the State Health Director to declare a rabies
emergency in the county or district. In determining whether a rabies emergency exists, the State Health Director shall consult with the Public Health Veterinarian and the State Agriculture Veterinarian and may consult with any other
source of veterinary expertise the State Health Director deems advisable. Upon finding that a rabies emergency exists in a county or district, the State Health Director shall petition the Executive Director of the Wildlife Resources
Commission to develop a plan pursuant to G.S. 113-291.2(a1) to reduce the threat of rabies exposure to humans and domestic animals by foxes, raccoons, skunks, or bobcats in the county or district. Upon determination by the State Health
Director that the rabies emergency no longer exists for a county or district, the State Health Director shall immediately notify the Executive Director of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

History.
1997-402, s. 1.

§§ 130A-202 through 130A-204.

Reserved for future codification purposes.